Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB205.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 9301(b) of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a paragraph to read:§ 9301. Supplemental funding for municipal highway maintenance.* * *(b) County allocation supplement.--Commencing July 1, 2014, the amount of $5,000,000 is appropriated out of the Motor License Fund to counties annually. The following shall apply:* * *(3) In addition to any other use authorized by law for money distributed under this subsection, a county may use the money for construction and maintenance of bridges owned by municipalities in the county.1234567891011121314151617181920 * * *Section 2. Section 9502(a)(2) of Title 75 is amended by adding a subparagraph to read:§ 9502. Imposition of tax.(a) General rule.--* * *(2) An additional 55 mills is hereby imposed on all liquid fuels and fuels as defined and provided in Chapter 90 and such tax shall also be collected as provided in section 9004(b), the proceeds of which shall be distributed as follows:* * *(vii) In addition to any other use authorized by law for money distributed under subparagraph (iv), a county may use the money for the construction and maintenance of bridges owned by municipalities in the county.* * *Section 3. This act shall take effect July 1, 2025, or immediately, whichever is later. IN SIX MONTHS.20250SB0205PN0892 - 2 - <--<--12345678910111213141516171819